California, session 20252026, AB2043.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 4.2 (commencing with Section 8577) is added to Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 4.2. Countering Unmanned Aircraft Systems Task Force 8577.On or before January 1, 2027, the Office of Emergency Services shall establish, within its office, the Countering Unmanned Aircraft Systems Task Force to develop a statewide strategy to protect mass gatherings, critical infrastructure, and other soft targets from attacks by unmanned aircraft systems.8577.2.8577. For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Office” means the Office of Emergency Services.(b) “Task force” means the Countering Unmanned Aircraft Systems Task Force established by this article.(c) “Unmanned aircraft system” means the same as “unmanned aircraft system” pursuant to Section 44801(12) of Title 49 of the United States Code.8577.4.The office shall seek to compose a membership of the task force that includes representatives of its legal branch, the State Threat Assessment Center, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection (CAL FIRE), the California National Guard, and representatives of privacy advocates, sheriffs, local police departments, local fire departments, local emergency managers, Major League Baseball, the National Football League, the University of California, the California State University, investor-owned utilities, LA28, FIFA, and amusement park associations.8577.2. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the office shall establish and lead the Countering Unmanned Aircraft Systems Task Force to develop a statewide strategy to protect mass gatherings, critical infrastructure, and other soft targets from attacks by unmanned aircraft systems.(b) The Director of Emergency Services shall seek to compose a membership of the task force with one or more representatives of all the following:(1) State Threat Assessment Center.(2) Department of the California Highway Patrol.(3) Military Department.(4) California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection (CAL FIRE).(5) California Utilities Emergency Association.(6) California State Sheriffs’ Association.(7) California Police Chiefs Association.(8) California Fire Chiefs Association.(9) LA28 Organizing Committee of the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games (LA28).(10) Any National Football League team based in California.(11) Any Major League Baseball team based in California.(12) Rank and file police officers.(13) Firefighters employed by a public agency.(14) Any organization devoted to the protection of personal privacy.(c) The Director of Emergency Services, at their discretion, may appoint any other members to the task force.8577.6.8577.4. The purpose of the task force shall be to organize and enhance the state’s lawful capabilities to detect, identify, track, and monitor unmanned aircraft systems and to support local and tribal governments in combating the unlawful use of unmanned aircraft systems that pose a threat to the safety and security of individuals, communities, and critical infrastructure.8577.8.8577.6. The primary objective of the task force shall be to develop and implement a statewide strategy to deter and counter attacks by unmanned aircraft systems by ensuring public safety entities have the resources, training, and operational capacity to detect, track, identify, and mitigate unmanned aircraft system threats.8577.10.8577.8. The goals of the task force shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(a) Protect critical infrastructure, mass gatherings, and other soft targets from threats by unmanned aircraft systems. systems in coordination with federally established airspace restrictions and operational requirements.(b) Support the deployment of fixed or portable systems for the detection, tracking, identification, and mitigation of unmanned aircraft systems consistent with applicable laws. federal laws, regulations, and restrictions.(c) Ensure statewide readiness, in coordination with federal officials, to respond to emergencies or public safety threats associated with malicious use of unmanned aircraft systems.8577.12.8577.10. The task force may achieve its purpose, primary objective, and goals by doing any of the following:(a) Developing or updating response plans specific to unmanned aircraft systems that integrate detection systems into existing emergency operation plans or incident command systems.(b) Conducting risk assessments to identify high-priority areas areas, in alignment with federal prioritization framework, for the detection of unmanned aircraft systems, including critical infrastructure, public events, or disaster-prone areas.(c) Developing Leveraging existing training methodologies to document standard operating procedures for responding to unauthorized or malicious activity by unmanned aircraft systems.(d) Coordinating with federal agencies to ensure compliance with and provide feedback on federal laws and regulations governing the detection and mitigation of unmanned aircraft systems.(e) Planning for the integration of detection systems for unmanned aircraft systems with existing public safety technologies, including geographic information system (GIS) platforms or computer-aided dispatch (CAD) systems.(f) Developing training for first responders Ensuring first responders receive appropriate training on the operation of specific detection systems for unmanned aircraft systems.(g) Developing train-the-trainer programs to build local capacity for ongoing training efforts. efforts, as appropriate in the context of federal training requirements.(h) Providing scenario-based response training to prepare responders for real-world threats by unmanned aircraft systems, including swarming drones or unmanned aircraft systems equipped with payloads.(i) Developing secure training for personnel on the interpretation of unmanned aircraft system detection data in the context of federal law and regulation and the integration of this data into decisionmaking processes. processes in alignment with federal training standards.(j) Designing tabletop exercises to simulate unmanned aircraft system-related incidents and test response plans, standard operating procedures, and coordination protocols.(k) Organizing functional exercises to test the operation of unmanned aircraft system detection systems and the integration of these systems with other public safety technologies.(l) Running full-scale exercises to simulate large-scale unmanned aircraft system threats, including unauthorized activity at a public event or near critical infrastructure, and multijurisdictional exercises to test coordination between the state, local agencies, tribal governments, federal agencies, and private sector partners.(m) Conducting after-action reviews to identify lessons learned and areas for improvement following exercises.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To prepare for and mitigate the evolving threat to public safety from attacks by malicious use of unmanned aircraft systems, including attacks on critical infrastructure and mass gatherings, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.